Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1307
Existing shooting range; permitted
activities.

A
shooting range that is existing and lawful shall be permitted to do any of
the following if done in compliance with the shooting range performance standards
and generally applicable building and safety codes:

(1) Repair,
remodel, or reinforce any improvement or facilities or building or structure
as may be necessary in the interest of public safety or to secure the continued
use of the building or improvement;

(2) Reconstruct, repair, rebuild, or resume
the use of a facility or building; or

(3) Do anything authorized under generally
recognized operation practices, including, but not limited to:

(a) Expand
or enhance its membership or opportunities for public participation; and

(b) Expand
or increase facilities or activities within the existing range area.

Laws 2009, LB503, § 7.